Connecticut, session 2026, HB05213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The chairpersons of the joint
2 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
3 matters relating to banking shall convene a working group to study
4 payroll processing methods employed by financial institutions and the
5 time required for payroll checks to clear.
6 (b) The working group shall include, but need not be limited to, the
7 following members:
8 (1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
9 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
10 relating to banking, or their designees;
11 (2) The Banking Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
HB5213 / File No. 106 1

HB5213 File No. 106
12 (3) One representative of a bank; and
13 (4) One representative of a credit union.
14 (c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
15 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking shall (1)
16 make all appointments to the working group, and (2) schedule the first
17 meeting of the working group, which shall be held not later than sixty
18 days after the effective date of this section.
19 (d) The members of the working group shall select two
20 cochairpersons from among the members of the working group.
21 (e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
22 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking
23 shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
24 (f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
25 report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
26 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
27 relating to banking, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
28 of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date
29 that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
BA Joint Favorable
HB5213 / File No. 106 2

HB5213 File No. 106
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which establishes a working group to study payroll
processing methods, results in no impact to the state as the members
have expertise in the subject area. The administrative staff of the
Banking Committee will serve as administrative staff for the group.
HB5213 / File No. 106 3

HB5213 File No. 106
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5213
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A WORKING GROUP TO EVALUATE
PAYROLL PROCESSING METHODS EMPLOYED BY FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS.